Colorado, session 2026A, SB192.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Producers that finance the producer responsibility program for
statewide recycling by paying dues into the program have the opportunity
to be heard through an administrative appeals process regarding the
eco-modulation factors and benchmarks applied to producer responsibility
dues;
(b) The legislative committee on legal services considered
ambiguity surrounding the scope of authority of the solid and hazardous
waste commission and the producer responsibility program for statewide
recycling advisory board related to appeals of the eco-modulation factors
and benchmarks applied to producer responsibility dues and affirmed the
commission's authority to direct the appeals process; and
(c) The act clarifies existing law, and, therefore, reaffirms the
actions of the solid and hazardous waste commission and the producer
responsibility program for statewide recycling advisory board related to
-2- 192

appeals of the assessed producer responsibility dues based on the
eco-modulation factors and benchmarks.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-17-704, amend
(7)(f) and (7)(g); and add (7)(h) as follows:
25-17-704. Producer responsibility program for statewide
recycling advisory board - creation - membership.
(7) The advisory board shall:
(f) Review the annual report submitted by the organization under
section 25-17-709 (2)(a); and
(g) Consult with the organization on the development and
updating of the minimum recyclable list; AND
(h) IF REQUESTED BY A PRODUCER PURSUANT TO SECTION
25-17-709 (1)(a)(II), HOLD AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SECTION 24-4-105 ON THE DUES BASED ON THE ECO-MODULATION
FACTORS AND BENCHMARKS ASSESSED BY THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION, ANY ADDITIONAL PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION, OR AN INDIVIDUAL PRODUCER OF AN ALTERNATIVE
COLLECTION PROGRAM.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-17-709, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
25-17-709. Producer responsibility dues - inspection of records
- annual reporting.
(1) (a) (I) Except as set forth in a plan approved by the executive
director pursuant to this part 7 on or after January 1, 2029, by a date
determined by the organization that is no later than January 1, 2026, and
annually thereafter by a date determined by the organization, a producer
shall pay producer responsibility dues to the organization based on the
-3- 192

funding mechanism described in the plan proposal pursuant to section
25-17-705 (4)(i).
(II) A PRODUCER THAT RECEIVES A FINAL INVOICE FROM, AND HAS
PROCEEDED THROUGH ANY REQUIRED MEDIATION WITH, THE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION, ANY ADDITIONAL PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION, OR AN INDIVIDUAL PRODUCER OF AN
ALTERNATIVE COLLECTION PROGRAM ASSESSING DUES FOR THE PROGRAM
MAY SUBMIT A WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE ADVISORY BOARD FOR A
HEARING TO CONTEST WHETHER THE ASSESSED DUES BASED ON THE
ECO-MODULATION FACTORS AND BENCHMARKS COMPLY WITH THE FINAL
PLAN, APPLICABLE COMMISSION RULES, AND THIS PART 7. AFTER HOLDING
THE REQUESTED HEARING, THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL ISSUE WRITTEN
RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT CONCERNING WHETHER THE
ASSESSED DUES BASED ON THE ECO-MODULATION FACTORS AND
BENCHMARKS COMPLY WITH THE FINAL PLAN, APPLICABLE COMMISSION
RULES, AND THIS PART 7.
(III) WITHIN FORTY-FIVE DAYS AFTER RECEIVING
RECOMMENDATIONS THAT THE ADVISORY BOARD ISSUES PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW
THE RECOMMENDATIONS AND DETERMINE WHETHER TO APPROVE OR
REJECT THE RECOMMENDATIONS. THE DEPARTMENT'S DETERMINATION ON
THE MATTER IS A FINAL AGENCY ACTION SUBJECT TO JUDICIAL REVIEW
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-4-106.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
-4- 192

referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- 192